Missouri, session 2026, HB1812.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 115, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 115.028, to read as follows:
115.028. 1. The department of health and senior services shall, on a monthly
basis, provide the secretary of state with a report of every death certificate filed with the
department in the preceding month.
2. The secretary of state shall, within ten days of receipt of the report required
under subsection 1 of this section, notify appropriate local election authorities of the
deaths.
3. The local election authority shall, within ten days of receipt of the notification
required under subsection 2 of this section, remove from its voter rolls any names
received from the secretary of the state.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.